incubator/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.tr.dix.xml
      <pardef n="ver/mek__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>irim</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ir<b/>miyim</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mem</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>miyim</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>irsin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ir<b/>misin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezsin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>misin</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ir</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ir<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>iriz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ir<b/>miyiz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>meyiz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>miyiz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>irsiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>ir<b/>misiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezsiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mez<b/>misiniz</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>irler</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>irler<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezler</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mezler<b/>mi</l>
            <r>mek<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>

      <e lm="vermek"><i>ver</i><par n="ver/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="gelmek"><i>gel</i><par n="ver/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="bilmek"><i>bil</i><par n="ver/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="çekinmek"><i>çekin</i><par n="ver/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="değinmek"><i>değin</i><par n="ver/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="devirmek"><i>devir</i><par n="ver/mek__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="vermek"><i>ver</i><par n="ver/mek__vblex"/></e>
